Utah statutes.
7-1-206.   Supervisor of savings and loan associations -- Responsibilities.

(1)  The commissioner shall designate an examiner as supervisor of savings and loan associations who shall be sufficiently qualified by training and experience in the savings and loan business or as an employee of a state or federal savings and loan supervisory agency to perform the duties of the office.

(2)  The supervisor of savings and loan associations is responsible, subject to the direction and control of the commissioner, for the general supervision and examination of all savings and loan associations and related institutions subject to the jurisdiction of the department. The supervisor shall assist and advise the commissioner in the execution of the laws of this state relating to these institutions, and shall perform other duties prescribed in this title or assigned by the commissioner.

